Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3204
County assessor; residence requirements.

A county assessor need not be a resident of the county when he or she files for election as county assessor, but a county assessor shall reside in a county for which he or she holds office.

Laws 1969, c. 623, § 6, p. 2522;

R.S.1943, (1986), § 77-426;

Laws 1990, LB 821, § 19;

Laws 1996, LB 1085, § 37.